Wyoming, session 2025, HB0228.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-2-123 is created to read:
22-2-123. Private funds in elections prohibited.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
agency or any state or county official responsible for
conducting elections, including, but not limited to, a
county clerk, shall solicit, accept, use or dispose of any
donation in the form of money, grants, property or personal
services from an individual or nongovernmental entity for
the purpose of funding any type of expenses related to
election administration, including, but not limited to,
voter education, voter outreach or voter registration
programs. All costs and expenses relating to elections
shall be paid with public funds. This subsection shall not
apply to meals or food provided or donated in support of
election training or education, or to meals or food
provided on election day to poll workers and other election
staff. This section shall not apply to elections that are
conducted by a special district in accordance with W.S.
22-29-113.
(b) No individual or nongovernmental entity shall
provide or offer to provide any donation in the form of
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0228
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
money, grants, property or personal services in violation
of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit:
(i) The acceptance and expenditure of federal
funds for purposes of conducting elections as provided by
law;
(ii) The use of private real property for
purposes of use as a polling place as provided by this
Election Code.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0228
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3